SpellChecking/SpellCheckingTests/bin/Debug/Dictionaries/chuvash.dic
çăпала/A
çатан/A
çуралакан/A
çыхăну/A
ăмсану/A
ăнланусăр/A
ăратлăх/A
ăсла/A
ăш/AB
Абу/A
Аид/A
Аккаç/A
Алексеевич/A
Альфред/A
Анисимович/A
Апрук/A
Армавир/A
Атăл/A
Ахтубинск/A
Барабинск/A
Белфаст/A
Больцман/A
Буг/A
Валентинович/A
Ватикан/A
Верхоянск/A
Витальевич/A
Волоколамск/A
Гавр/A
Геннадьевич/A
Глостер/A
Гурзуф/A
Данилов/A
Джек/A
Дон/A
Евфрат/A
Епифан/A
Жан/A
Звенигород/A
Игоревич/A
Илларион/A
Ильпарăс/A
Иосиф/A
Исампай/A
Ишук/A
Кĕлбану/A
Казимирович/A
Капитон/A
Кастор/A
Кизляр/A
Кнеçук/A
Котлас/A
Кузбасс/A
Кыштым/A
Ленинск/A
Лиссабон/A
Лява/A
Магдебург/A
Малышев/A
Массачусетс/A
Мерккуç/A
Милюк/A
Минусинск/A
Митюк/A
Моисеевич/A
Мурсанюк/A
Намюр/A
Нетюк/A
Новгород/A
Нюмкка/A
Октябрьск/A
Остин/A
Пай/A
Пайтукан/A
Партизанск/A
Перпус/A
Пиклат/A
Пиньака/A
Питтук/A
Поликарп/A
Пулат/A
Реюньон/A
Рсанюк/A
Саарбрюккен/A
Сайраслу/A
Санка/A
Саттус/A
Сверуха/A
Сенерчук/A
Сертук/A
Сидорович/A
Симун/A
Ситяхван/A
Спрингфилд/A
Сумгаит/A
Таймыр/A
Теверук/A
Тимĕрплат/A
Тобольск/A
Туймăрса/A
Тулон/A
Тютюлка/A
Уливан/A
Упамсар/A
Уттю/A
Федот/A
Франциск/A
Хаймулла/A
Хохлова/A
Цефей/A
Шăмакка/A
Шерккук/A
Щецин/A
Элмук/A
Эпсом/A
Эхметйан/A
Яковлев/A
Янук/A
Ятман/A
аббат/A
авăнчăк/A
авиаçыхăну/A
авкăç/A
автогрейдер/A
автомотоклуб/A
автотараса/A
агитпункт/A
адресат/A
айăплакан/A
акăлчан/A
акведук/A
актёр/A
аланчăк/A
алмаккай/A
альбатрос/A
амавус/A
амур/A
анас/A
аноним/A
антиквар/A
антоним/A
апатлăх/A
аппендицит/A
аранçă/A
арка/A
арпашу/A
архив/A
асăрхану/A
асапсăр/A
ассистент/A
аталăх/A
атрибут/A
ахăрав/A
ачасăрлăх/A
аэрофлот/A
баклан/A
бандаж/A
барельеф/A
батрак/A
бельэтаж/A
библиограф/A
бирюза/A
боксит/A
борщ/A
браузер/A
брошюровщик/A
бульвар/A
бутерброд/A
вăйăçă/A
вăрăнчăк/A
вăтанăç/A
вакланчăклăх/A
варă/A
ватă/AE
велосипедист/A
верховнăй/A
виадук/A
вирус/A
воин/A
врач/A
вупкăн/A
вырăс/A
газосварщик/A
гарпун/A
гексахлоран/A
геолог/A
гестаповец/A
гимназист/A
гладиолус/A
горнист/A
гражданин/A
грим/A
гудок/A
даргин/A
дезертир/A
демарш/A
десерт/A
диабет/A
дивизион/A
динозавр/A
дифирамб/A
докер/A
допинг/A
дружинник/A
енот/A
живописец/A
завхоз/A
зал/A
затвор/A
зенит/A
зуммер/A
иждивенец/A
иксу/A
импрессионизм/A
индолог/A
инструментальщик/A
историк/A
йăмпăлтак/A
йăптăх/A
йăслав/A
кăçатă/A
кăмăллăх/A
кăрлай/A
кăшкаç/A
каварçă/A
кактус/A
калым/A
канон/A
каплам/A
караванçă/A
кармак/A
карьерист/A
катан/A
кашăкçă/A
кемпинг/A
киноконцерт/A
клевер/A
кокос/A
комбед/A
компот/A
конспект/A
коньяк/A
косметолог/A
красногвардеец/A
круиз/A
куккук/A
кумма/A
курăнăç/A
кусак/A
лăкăртăк/A
лайăхлăх/A
лапăртанчăк/AE
латтă/A
ленивец/A
линолеум/A
логикăлăх/A
лутка/A
мăкаçей/A
мăшăрлану/A
майлашу/A
малаш/A
марал/A
масон/A
мая/A
меньшевизм/A
миелит/A
минор/A
монархизм/A
мотошлем/A
муркаш/A
нăкăт/A
нараста/A
начарлăх/A
нитроглицерин/A
облĕçтăвком/A
олимпиец/A
орда/A
отчёт/A
пăрăнăç/A
пăтăр/HA
пĕртăван/A
палăрăм/A
паникёр/A
паразитизм/A
паромщик/A
пастор/A
пахча/A
переписчик/A
пилĕккунлăх/A
планеризм/A
плюш/A
позитив/A
полярник/A
почвовед/A
преступник/A
прихожăй/A
производственник/A
профактив/A
пуçтах/A
пултарулăх/A
пурсăр/A
путуш/A
пыршă/A
радиоточка/A
ранг/A
реакционер/A
редуктор/A
релятивист/A
рефрен/A
рубильник/A
сăлтăк/A
сăрă/A
савăнăç/A
сакруй/A
самоходка/A
саппан/A
сатворккă/A
сдельщик/A
сенбернар/A
символ/A
скетч/A
слёт/A
сопрано/AI
спиннингист/A
старовер/A
стихийăлăх/A
субконтинент/A
сулатник/A
сурăм/A
сфинкс/A
сых/A
тăваткал/A
тăмсай/A
тăрăшулăх/A
тăхар/A
тавра/A
талăклăх/A
танкодром/A
таракан/A
театр/A
терем/A
титр/A
тост/A
трельяж/A
ту/HA
тумлам/A
тупик/A
турпас/A
туф/A
тыткăн/A
уголовнăй/A
укол/A
ультрафиолет/A
урапалăх/A
условнăй/A
участковăй/A
фальстарт/A
фельетон/A
финал/A
фонограф/A
фототелеграф/A
футуризм/A
хăлхасăр/A
хăрпу/A
хăюсăрлăх/A
хайласăр/A
ханша/A
хаярлăх/A
хризолит/A
хумхану/A
хурăнташ/A
хутаç/A
хыпарсăр/A
целинник/A
циферблат/A
чăпăркка/A
чавсавай/A
чарлан/A
чугун/A
чышкă/A
шăнкăрав/A
шăрчăк/A
шакмак/A
шапаш/A
шах/A
шифровальщик/A
шпат/A
штурвал/A
шутник/A
ывăс/A
эвенк/A
экспонат/A
электромонтаж/A
эпицентр/A
эшафот/A
юнкун/A
юсавлăх/A
якатмăш/A
япалакка/A
ящер/A
